Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 12. Domestication and Conversion.
§ 13.1-1276.
Effect of entity conversion.

When an entity conversion under this article becomes effective, with respect to that entity:

The title to all real estate and other property remains in the resulting entity without reversion or impairment;

The liabilities of the converting entity remain the liabilities of the resulting entity; and

A proceeding pending may be continued by or against the resulting entity as if the conversion did not occur.

When the resulting entity is a domestic limited liability company:

The articles of organization attached to the articles of entity conversion constitute the articles of organization of the resulting entity;

The beneficial interests of the converting entity are reclassified into membership interests of the resulting entity in accordance with the plan of entity conversion; and the holders of the beneficial interests of the converting entity are entitled only to the rights provided in the plan of entity conversion;

The resulting entity is deemed to:

Be a domestic limited liability company for all purposes;

Be the same limited liability company without interruption as the converting entity that existed before the conversion; and

Have been organized on the date that the converting entity was originally incorporated, organized, or formed;

The converting entity shall cease to be a business trust when the certificate of entity conversion becomes effective; and

Any trustee of a converting entity who, before the conversion, was liable for the liabilities or obligations of the converting entity is not released from those liabilities or obligations by reason of the conversion.

When the converting entity is a partnership or a limited partnership:

The articles of trust attached to the articles of entity conversion constitute the articles of trust of the resulting entity;

The partnership interests of the converting entity are reclassified into beneficial interests of the resulting entity in accordance with the plan of entity conversion; and the partners of the converting entity are entitled only to the rights provided in the plan of entity conversion;

The resulting entity is deemed to:

Be a domestic business trust for all purposes;

Be the same business trust without interruption as the converting entity that existed before the conversion; and

Have been organized on the date that the converting entity was originally formed, organized, or incorporated;

The converting entity shall cease to be a partnership or limited partnership when the certificate of entity conversion becomes effective;

If the converting entity is a partnership, a statement of partnership authority filed by the partnership that has not been canceled shall be deemed canceled when the certificate of entity conversion becomes effective;

If the converting entity is a limited partnership, its certificate of limited partnership shall be deemed canceled when the certificate of entity conversion becomes effective;

If the partnership or limited partnership is registered as a registered limited liability partnership, that status shall be deemed canceled when the certificate of entity conversion becomes effective; and

Any partner of a converting entity who, before the conversion, was liable for the liabilities or obligations of the converting entity is not released from those liabilities or obligations by reason of the conversion.

When the converting entity is an other entity:

The articles of trust attached to the articles of entity conversion constitute the articles of trust of the resulting entity;

The shares or interests of the converting entity are reclassified into beneficial interests of the resulting entity in accordance with the plan of entity conversion; and the persons having an interest in the converting entity are entitled only to the rights provided in the plan of entity conversion;

The surviving entity is deemed to:

Be a business trust for all purposes;

Be the same business trust without interruption as the converting entity that existed before the conversion; and

Have been formed on the date that the converting entity was originally incorporated, organized, or formed; and

The converting entity shall cease to be an other entity when the certificate of entity conversion becomes effective.

History.

2002, c. 621; 2005, c. 765; 2016, c. 288.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 288, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, before the effective date of this act with respect to (i) the conversion of a domestic or foreign partnership or limited partnership to a limited liability company or (ii) the domestication of a non-United States entity as a limited liability company.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “subdivision A 5” for “subdivision A 4” in subdivision 5.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 288 rewrote the section.

§ 13.1-1277.
Abandonment of entity conversion.

Unless otherwise provided in the plan of entity conversion, after a plan of entity conversion has been approved by the converting entity in the manner required by this article and at any time before the certificate of entity conversion has become effective, the plan may be abandoned by the converting entity without action by its trustees or partners, as the case may be, in accordance with any procedures set forth in the plan or, if no such procedures are set forth in the plan:

When the converting entity is a business trust, by a vote of the trustees of the business trust that is equal to or greater than the vote cast for the plan of entity conversion pursuant to subsection A of §

13.1-1274

;

When the converting entity is a domestic partnership, by a vote of the partners of the domestic partnership that is equal to or greater than the vote cast for the plan of entity conversion pursuant to subsection B of §

13.1-1274

;

When the converting entity is a domestic limited partnership, by a vote of the partners of the domestic limited partnership that is equal to or greater than the vote cast for the plan of entity conversion pursuant to subsection C of § 13.1-1274; and

When the converting entity is an other entity, by a vote of the persons who had authority to approve the entity conversion on behalf of the other entity that is equal to or greater than the vote cast for the plan of entity conversion pursuant to subsection D of § 13.1-1274.

If an entity conversion is abandoned after articles of entity conversion have been filed with the Commission but before the certificate of entity conversion has become effective, a statement of abandonment shall be signed on behalf of the converting entity and delivered to the Commission for filing prior to the effective time and date of the certificate of entity conversion. If the Commission finds that the statement of abandonment complies with the requirements of law, it shall issue a certificate of abandonment, effective as of the date and time the statement of abandonment was received by the Commission, and the entity conversion shall be deemed abandoned and shall not become effective.

The statement of abandonment shall contain:

The name of the converting entity and its entity type;

The name of the resulting entity set forth in the articles of entity conversion;

The date on which the articles of the entity conversion were filed with the Commission;

The date and time on which the Commission’s certificate of entity conversion becomes effective; and

A statement that the entity conversion is being abandoned in accordance with this section.

History.

2002, c. 621; 2016, c. 288; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, c. 288, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, before the effective date of this act with respect to (i) the conversion of a domestic or foreign partnership or limited partnership to a limited liability company or (ii) the domestication of a non-United States entity as a limited liability company.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 288 rewrote the section.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the section. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.